District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.15

Removal or injury of property forbidden.

It is forbidden to step or climb upon, remove, or in any way injure any statue, seat, wall, fountain, or other erection or architectural feature, or any tree, shrub, plant, or turf in said United States Capitol Grounds.

History

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 718, ch. 707, § 5

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-503.18.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-111.
1973 Ed., § 9-122.